Utah statutes.
23-27-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Wildlife Board.
(2) (a)  "Conveyance" means a terrestrial or aquatic vehicle or a vehicle part
that may carry or contain a Dreissena mussel.
(b)  "Conveyance" includes a motor vehicle, a vessel, a motorboat, a sailboat,
a personal watercraft, a container, a trailer, a live well, or a bilge area.
(3)  "Decontaminate" means to:
(a)  drain and dry all non-treated water; and
(b)  chemically or thermally treat in accordance with rule.
(4)  "Director" means the director of the division.
(5)  "Division" means the Division of Wildlife Resources.
(6)  "Dreissena mussel" means a mussel of the genus Dreissena at any life
stage, including a zebra mussel, a quagga mussel, and Conrad's false mussel.
(7)  "Equipment" means an article, tool, implement, or device capable of
carrying or containing:
(a)  water; or
(b)  a Dreissena mussel.
(8)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the Department of
Natural Resources.
(9)  "Facility" means a structure that is located within or adjacent to a
water body.
(10)  "Infested water" means a geographic region, water body, facility, or
water supply system within or outside the state that the board identifies in
rule as carrying or containing a Dreissena mussel.
(11)  "Water body" means natural or impounded surface water, including a
stream, river, spring, lake, reservoir, pond, wetland, tank, and fountain.
(12) (a)  "Water supply system" means a system that treats, conveys, or
distributes water for irrigation, industrial, waste water treatment, or
culinary use.
(b)  "Water supply system" includes a pump, canal, ditch, or pipeline.
(c)  "Water supply system" does not include a water body.
